Maryland, session 2025, HB1244.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
SUBTITLE 12B. MARYLAND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES ADMINISTRATION
WAIVER ADVISORY COUNCIL.
7–12B–01.
IN THIS SUBTITLE, “COUNCIL” MEANS THE MARYLAND DEVELOPMENTAL
DISABILITIES ADMINISTRATION WAIVER ADVISORY COUNCIL.
7–12B–02.
(A) THERE IS A MARYLAND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES
ADMINISTRATION WAIVER ADVISORY COUNCIL IN THE ADMINISTRATION.
(B) THE PURPOSE OF THE COUNCIL IS TO:
(1) ADVISE AND PROVIDE RECOMMENDATIONS TO THE
ADMINISTRATION ON SYSTEM DESIGN, SERVICE DELIVERY, AND QUALITY
– 1 –

Ch. 756 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
ENHANCEMENT STRATEGIES FOR THE MEDICAID WAIVER PROGRAMS OPERATED BY
THE ADMINISTRATION; AND
(2) FOSTER MEANINGFUL ENGAGEMENT AND ESTABLISH A
FEEDBACK LOOP WITH ALL STAKEHOLDERS WHILE PRIORITIZING INPUT FROM
INDIVIDUALS WITH LIVED EXPERIENCE WITH A MEDICAID WAIVER PROGRAM.
(C) THE COUNCIL SHALL ADHERE TO PERSON–CENTERED THINKING,
DIVERSITY, EQUITY, AND INCLUSION PRINCIPLES, AND EVIDENCE–BASED AND
DATA–DRIVEN DISCUSSION AND PROBLEM SOLVING.
7–12B–03.
(A) (1) THE COUNCIL CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING VOTING MEMBERS,
APPOINTED BY THE SECRETARY OF HEALTH:
(I) 18 20 21 INDIVIDUALS WITH LIVED EXPERIENCE
PARTICIPATING IN AN ADMINISTRATION PROGRAM THAT SHALL INCLUDE:
1. REPRESENTATIVES FROM ADVOCACY GROUPS FOR
INDIVIDUALS WITH INTELLECTUAL AND DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES; AND
2. EQUAL REPRESENTATION FROM INDIVIDUALS WHO
HAVE EXPERIENCED SELF–DIRECTED DELIVERY MODELS AND INDIVIDUALS WHO
HAVE EXPERIENCED TRADITIONAL DELIVERY MODELS;
(II) TWO LICENSED PROVIDERS OF RESIDENTIAL AND DAY
SERVICES;
(III) TWO CERTIFIED PROVIDERS OF SERVICES INCLUDING
EMPLOYMENT, PERSONAL SUPPORT, TECHNOLOGY, AND TRANSPORTATION;
(IV) ONE TWO COORDINATION OF COMMUNITY SERVICES
PROVIDER PROVIDERS;
(V) ONE FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT AND COUNSELING SERVICES
PROVIDER;
(VI) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF AN ETHNIC ADVOCACY GROUP IN
THE STATE;
(VII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND CENTER FOR
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES;
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 756
(VIII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND
DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES COUNCIL;
(IX) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE SELF–DIRECTED
ADVOCACY NETWORK OF MARYLAND;
(X) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE PARENTS’ PLACE OF
MARYLAND;
(XI) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND ASSOCIATION
OF COMMUNITY SERVICES;
(XII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE ARC MARYLAND;
(XIII) ONE INDIVIDUAL WHO IS A SUPPORT BROKER;
(XIV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF SERVICE COORDINATION, INC.;
(XI) (XIII) (XV) THREE FAMILY MEMBERS WITH EXPERIENCE
WITH SELF–DIRECTED SERVICES; AND
(XII) (XIV) (XVI) THREE FAMILY MEMBERS WITH EXPERIENCE
WITH TRADITIONAL SERVICES.
(2) THE COUNCIL CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING NONVOTING
MEMBERS:
(I) ONE MEMBER OF THE SENATE OF MARYLAND, APPOINTED
BY THE PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE;
(II) ONE MEMBER OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES, APPOINTED
BY THE SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE;
(III) THE DIRECTOR OF FEDERAL PROGRAMS AND INTEGRITY
IN THE ADMINISTRATION;
(IV) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPARTMENT OF
DISABILITIES, DESIGNATED BY THE SECRETARY OF DISABILITIES;
(V) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING
AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT, DESIGNATED BY THE SECRETARY OF HOUSING
AND COMMUNITY DEVELOPMENT;
– 3 –

Ch. 756 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(VI) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN
SERVICES, DESIGNATED BY THE SECRETARY OF HUMAN SERVICES;
(VII) ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DIVISION OF
REHABILITATION SERVICES IN THE STATE DEPARTMENT OF EDUCATION,
DESIGNATED BY THE STATE SUPERINTENDENT OF SCHOOLS;
(VIII) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, DESIGNATED BY THE
SECRETARY OF HEALTH:
1. ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE OFFICE OF LONG
TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORTS;
2. ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH ADMINISTRATION;
3. ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE OFFICE OF HEALTH
CARE QUALITY;
4. ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE ELIGIBILITY
DETERMINATION DIVISION OF THE OFFICE OF ELIGIBILITY SERVICES; AND
5. ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE MARYLAND LONG
TERM SERVICES AND SUPPORT SYSTEM PROGRAM MANAGEMENT OFFICE; AND
(IX) THE FOLLOWING MEMBERS, APPOINTED BY THE
SECRETARY OF HEALTH:
1. ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF THE NATIONAL
ASSOCIATION OF STATE DIRECTORS OF DEVELOPMENTAL DISABILITIES SERVICES;
AND
2. ONE REPRESENTATIVE OF APPLIED
SELF–DIRECTION.
(3) THE LICENSED OR CERTIFIED PROVIDERS ON THE COUNCIL
SHALL INCLUDE REPRESENTATIVES FROM EACH REGION AND FROM THE
MARYLAND ASSOCIATION OF COMMUNITY SERVICES AND THE ARC OF MARYLAND.
(4) (3) FAMILY MEMBERS APPOINTED TO THE COUNCIL SHALL
INCLUDE AT LEAST ONE FAMILY MEMBER FROM EACH REGION.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 756
(5) (4) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL ESTABLISH AN APPLICATION
PROCESS AND REVIEW PROCESS FOR MEMBERS WHO WISH TO SERVE ON THE
COUNCIL.
(6) (5) TO THE EXTENT PRACTICABLE, THE MEMBERSHIP OF THE
COUNCIL SHALL REFLECT THE GENDER, RACIAL, ETHNIC, AND GEOGRAPHICAL
DIVERSITY OF THE STATE.
(B) (1) THE TERM OF A MEMBER IS 3 YEARS.
(2) THE TERMS OF MEMBERS ARE STAGGERED AS REQUIRED BY THE
TERMS PROVIDED FOR THE MEMBERS OF THE COUNCIL ON OCTOBER 1, 2025.
(3) AT THE END OF A TERM, A MEMBER CONTINUES TO SERVE UNTIL
A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND QUALIFIES.
(4) A MEMBER WHO IS APPOINTED AFTER A TERM HAS BEGUN SERVES
ONLY FOR THE REST OF THE TERM AND UNTIL A SUCCESSOR IS APPOINTED AND
QUALIFIES.
(5) A MEMBER MAY NOT SERVE CONSECUTIVE TERMS BUT MAY SERVE
FOR MULTIPLE NONCONSECUTIVE TERMS.
(C) (1) THE DIRECTOR OF FEDERAL PROGRAMS SHALL SERVE AS A
NONVOTING COCHAIR.
(2) THE COUNCIL SHALL VOTE FOR THE ADDITIONAL COCHAIR.
(D) (1) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL PROVIDE STAFF FOR THE COUNCIL.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL INCLUDE A DEDICATED COUNCIL
WEBPAGE ON THE DEPARTMENT’S WEBSITE THAT INCLUDES MEETING DATES AND
TIMES, AGENDAS AND OTHER MEETING DOCUMENTS, AND RECORDED PAST
MEETINGS OF THE COUNCIL.
(E) A MEMBER OF THE COUNCIL:
(1) MAY NOT RECEIVE COMPENSATION AS A MEMBER OF THE
COUNCIL; BUT
(2) IS ENTITLED TO REIMBURSEMENT FOR EXPENSES UNDER THE
STANDARD STATE TRAVEL REGULATIONS, AS PROVIDED IN THE STATE BUDGET.
– 5 –

Ch. 756 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(F) THE COUNCIL MAY PROVIDE TRAVEL ARRANGEMENTS, AS NECESSARY,
FOR MEMBERS OF THE COUNCIL WITH DISABILITIES.
7–12B–04.
(A) (1) THE COUNCIL SHALL MEET ONCE EVERY 2 MONTHS IN A
LOCATION THAT IS MADE PUBLICLY AVAILABLE AT LEAST 2 WEEKS BEFORE THE
MEETING.
(2) THE COUNCIL MAY HOLD ADDITIONAL MEETINGS IF DETERMINED
NECESSARY BY THE COCHAIRS.
(3) MEETINGS OF THE COUNCIL SHALL:
(I) BE OPEN TO THE PUBLIC AND RECORDED BY VIDEO;
(II) FOLLOW AGENDAS THAT ARE DISTRIBUTED AT LEAST 1
WEEK BEFORE THE MEETING TO COUNCIL MEMBERS BY E–MAIL;
(III) CONCLUDE WITH A CLEAR UNDERSTANDING OF
EXPECTATIONS AND ASSIGNMENTS FOR FUTURE STEPS;
(IV) PROVIDE ACCOMMODATIONS FOR INDIVIDUALS WITH
DISABILITIES; AND
(V) INCLUDE TIME FOR PUBLIC COMMENT AFTER MEETING
AGENDA ITEMS HAVE BEEN ADDRESSED.
(4) A MEETING OF THE COUNCIL MAY BE HELD VIRTUALLY IF
DETERMINED NECESSARY BY THE COCHAIRS.
(5) THE COUNCIL SHALL PROVIDE NOTICE OF ITS MEETINGS BY
E–MAIL TO MEMBERS AT LEAST 1 WEEK BEFORE THE MEETING AND SHALL INCLUDE
AN AGENDA AND ANY DOCUMENTS TO BE REVIEWED FOR THE MEETING.
(6) THE COUNCIL SHALL DISTRIBUTE MEETING MINUTES TO
MEMBERS WITHIN 2 WEEKS AFTER EACH COUNCIL MEETING.
(B) THE COUNCIL MAY FORM WORKGROUPS THAT MAY MEET AS DIRECTED
BY THE COCHAIRS.
(C) THE COUNCIL SHALL ESTABLISH A CODE OF CONDUCT FOR COUNCIL
MEETINGS.
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 756
7–12B–05.
(A) THE COUNCIL SHALL PROVIDE ADVICE AND MAKE RECOMMENDATIONS
TO THE ADMINISTRATION ON:
(1) ADMINISTRATION–OPERATED MEDICAID WAIVER PROGRAM
SYSTEM DESIGN, INCLUDING WAIVER APPLICATION REGULATIONS AND POLICIES;
(2) SERVICE DELIVERY AND ACCESS TO SERVICES;
(3) FEDERAL WAIVER ASSURANCES;
(4) ENSURING ACCESS TO MEDICAID SERVICES;
(5) QUALITY ENHANCEMENT EFFORTS AND IMPROVEMENT
STRATEGIES;
(6) COMMUNICATION WITH STAKEHOLDERS, INCLUDING A
TRANSPARENT FEEDBACK PROCESS; AND
(7) COLLABORATIVE PROCESSES WITH STAKEHOLDERS.
(B) (1) THE COUNCIL SHALL VOTE ON THE ADVICE AND
RECOMMENDATIONS TO PROVIDE TO THE ADMINISTRATION UNDER SUBSECTION (A)
OF THIS SECTION.
(2) THE COUNCIL SHALL ATTEMPT TO REACH CONSENSUS AND ALL
MEMBERS SHALL BE AFFORDED AN OPPORTUNITY TO BE HEARD.
(3) IF CONSENSUS CANNOT BE REACHED ON A PARTICULAR ISSUE,
THE COUNCIL MAY VOTE WITH A 75% AGREEMENT THRESHOLD.
(4) (I) A COUNCIL MEMBER MAY NOT VOTE ON ANOTHER
MEMBER’S BEHALF.
(II) A COUNCIL MEMBER MAY DESIGNATE A PROXY FOR THE
MEMBER.
(III) A COUNCIL MEMBER’S PROXY MAY VOTE ON BEHALF OF A
MEMBER ONLY IF THE PROXY IS ATTENDING THE MEETING FOR THE MEMBER.
(IV) A COUNCIL MEMBER’S PROXY MAY NOT VOTE ON BEHALF OF
THE PROXY.
– 7 –

Ch. 756 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the terms of the initial voting
members of the Maryland Development Disabilities Administration Waiver Advisory
Council shall expire as follows:
(1) 18 20 22 members in 2027; and
(2) 17 19 21 members in 2028.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 20, 2025.
– 8 –